src/verb-myv-morph.txt
LEXICON Conjunctive-kadoms_Obj
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:я "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:е "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:я 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.13@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.16@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:к "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.21@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:к "+ScSg2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.23@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.26@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:м "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.31@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:м "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.31@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:з 0:е "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:О1 0:л 0:с 0:е "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.33@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:з 0:е "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.36@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.43@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.46@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:и 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.43@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:и 0:к "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.46@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:к "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.53@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:к "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.56@" > Derya_KLoss ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.63@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl3":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.66@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.54@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.51@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.34@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.64@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.61@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:и 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.12@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:з 0:е 0:т 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.32@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.15@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.42@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.45@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.35@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.62@" > Derya ;
< 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:и 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.65@" > Derya ;

< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl2":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:м 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg1":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.24@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.12@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:з 0:и 0:т "+ScSg3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.32@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.15@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.45@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl1":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.42@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScSg3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.35@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в  0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcSg2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.62@" > Derya ;
< "+Use/Sub/Dial":0 0:в 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е 0:з 0:ь "+ScPl3":0 "+OcPl2":0  "@U.CONJ-PX.65@" > Derya ;

LEXICON Conjunctive-kundams
:%> Conjunctive-noArrow ;

LEXICON Derya
+Pcle+Conj:деря VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;

LEXICON ImpDerya
+Pcle+Conj:деря VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;

LEXICON Derya_KLoss
+Pcle+Conj:деря VerbEnd_Clitic ;
 VerbEnd_ImpClitic ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! OPTATIVE !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ILYA
 Optative-kundams ;
<"@R.CONJ.ObjAll@"> ILYA_Obj ;
< 0:з 0:а 0:н "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScSg1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.10@" >  VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:з 0:а 0:т "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScSg2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.20@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:з 0:О1 "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScSg3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.30@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:с 0:т 0:а 0:н 0:о "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
< 0:с 0:т 0:а 0:д 0:о "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:с 0:т "+ScPl3":0 "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Imprt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@" "+ScSg2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.20@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< 0:д 0:О1 "+Imprt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@" "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
! Attested in Grammar 2000
< "+Gr2000":0 0:з 0:т 0:а 0:н 0:о "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScPl1":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.40@" > VerbEnd_lak-Clitic ;
< "+Gr2000":0 0:з 0:т 0:а 0:д 0:о "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScPl2":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.50@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
< "+Gr2000":0 0:з 0:т "+Opt":0 "@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@" "+ScPl3":0 "@U.CONJ-PX.60@" > VerbEnd_Clitic ;
